Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DUTIES OF STATE TREASURER
SECTION 1.  ORS 178.050 is amended to read:
178.050. The State Treasurer shall:
(1) Keep the office at the seat of government.
(2) Receive and have charge of all moneys paid into the State Treasury.
(3) Pay out moneys from the State Treasury as directed by law.
(4) Manage unclaimed property under ORS 98.302 to 98.436, escheated property under ORS
112.055 and 116.253, the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund and the Unclaimed Property
School Fund.
(5) Administer estates under ORS 113.235.
[(4)] (6)  Permit the books, papers and transactions of the office to be open at all  times to in-
spection and examination by the Governor, Secretary of  State, the legislature and any committee
of either branch of the legislature.
[(5)] (7)  Deliver over to the successor in office all moneys, books, papers, furniture and  other
effects belonging to or preserved in the office.
[(6)] (8) Perform all other duties imposed upon the State Treasurer by law.
SUBACCOUNTS OF THE COMMON SCHOOL FUND
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 273.
SECTION 3. (1) There is established the Unclaimed  Property School Fund within the
Common School Fund.
(2) The Unclaimed Property School Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  by act
of law; and
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 1
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund  from the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund under
section 6 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Moneys in  the Unclaimed Property School Fund are continuously appropriated to the
State Treasurer for the treasurer’s costs of administering the fund.
(4) The State Treasurer may  transfer from the fund to the Unclaimed Property and Es-
tates Fund amounts necessary to pay  any unanticipated expenses payable from the Un-
claimed Property and Estates Fund.
(5) Interest earned by the Unclaimed Property School Fund  is credited to the fund. Be-
fore July 1 of each year, the State Treasurer, with the approval  of the State Land Board,
shall transfer any interest of the fund that exceeds  the net liabilities of the fund to the
Distributable Income Account of the Common School Fund under ORS 273.105.
SECTION 4. (1) There is established the  Legacy Unclaimed Property School Fund within
the Common School Fund.
(2) The Legacy Unclaimed Property School Fund consists of  moneys transferred to the
fund under section 7 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Interest earned by the fund is credited to the Common School Fund.
(4) Moneys in the Legacy Unclaimed Property School Fund are continuously  appropriated
to the Department of State Lands for the department’s costs of administering the fund.
(5) The department shall transfer moneys from the  Legacy Unclaimed Property School
Fund to the Common School  Fund as required under ORS 116.253 (1) and Article VIII, section
2 (1)(b), of the Oregon Constitution.
(6) The department may transfer moneys from the fund to the Unclaimed  Property and
Estates Fund to  cover valid claims against the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund only
if:
(a) After transferring all available  moneys to the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund
from the  Unclaimed Property School Fund under section 3 (5) of this 2021 Act, there are in-
sufficient moneys available to cover the claim; and
(b) The claim is against moneys that were transferred to the Legacy Unclaimed Property
School Fund under section 7 of this 2021 Act.
ADMINISTRATION OF UNCLAIMED AND ESCHEATED PROPERTY
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  98.302 to
98.436.
SECTION 6. (1) There is established the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund,  separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund consists of:
(a) Unclaimed property, including the proceeds of unclaimed property,  under ORS 98.302
to 98.436;
(b) Penalties related to unclaimed property assessed under ORS 98.992;
(c) Estates escheated to the state under ORS 112.055  and subject to claims under ORS
116.253;
(d) Moneys in accounts that escheat to the state under ORS 708A.430 (5) or 723.466 (5);
(e) Moneys transferred to the fund by the  Department of State Lands from the Un-
claimed Property School Fund under section 3 of this 2021 Act;
(f) Other  moneys appropriated or transferred to the Unclaimed Property and Estates
Fund by the Legislative Assembly or by operation of law; and
(g) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Treasurer for:
(a) The costs of administering unclaimed property under ORS 98.302 to 98.436;
(b) The costs of administering estates under ORS 113.235;
(c) The payment of valid claims to abandoned property made under ORS 98.392;
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 2
(d) The payment of valid claims for escheated property under ORS 116.253; and
(e) The costs of administering the fund.
(4) Before  July 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the Unclaimed
Property and Estates Fund:
(a) To the Common School Fund, all moneys  and properties of escheated estates for
which any claim has elapsed under ORS 116.253; and
(b) To the Unclaimed Property School Fund, all  remaining moneys and properties in the
Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund, except for the amount that the State  Treasurer an-
ticipates requiring to meet the expenses and liabilities of the Unclaimed Property and Es-
tates Fund until the end of the following  fiscal year, including transfers under paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
SECTION 7.
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, effective July
1, 2021, the  following accounts, funds and sources of money are hereby transferred to the
Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund under section 6 of this 2021 Act:
(a) The Common School Fund Account;
(b) The Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund;
(c) The funds or accounts in which moneys are held  by the Department of State Lands
or State Treasurer as an estate administrator under ORS 113.235; and
(d) The funds or accounts in which moneys  are held by the Department of State Lands
or State Treasurer as  escheated estates under ORS 116.193, 116.203, 116.253, 708A.430 or
723.466 that are still capable of being claimed under ORS 116.253 (1).
(2) The Department of State Lands and State  Treasurer shall transfer only the moneys
identified as net activity that occurred on or after July 1, 2020,  and on or before June 30,
2021, within the funds listed in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section  to the Unclaimed
Property and Estates Fund.
(3) The Department of State Lands and the State Treasurer shall transfer to  the Legacy
Unclaimed Property School Fund under section 4 of this 2021 Act moneys in the  accounts
listed in subsection (1) of this  section that are not transferred under subsection (2) of this
section.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 2 to 7 of this 2021  Act, the amendments to ORS 98.352, 98.386,
98.396, 98.992, 112.055, 116.193, 116.253, 178.050, 293.455, 293.701, 327.405, 708A.430, 711.225,
711.590, 716.905 and 723.466 by sections 1 and 10 to 25 of this 2021 Act and the repeal of ORS
98.388 by section 9 of  this 2021 Act are intended to complete the transfer of the unclaimed
and escheated  property from the Department of State Lands to the State Treasurer under
chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, to rename the sources of funds listed in section 7 (1) of  this
2021 Act to the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund and to carry out the  purposes of the
fund under section 6 of this 2021 Act.
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing  and clarifying statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words designating the “Common School  Fund Account” or “Unclaimed
Property Revolving Fund”, wherever they occur in statutory law,  other words designating
the “Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund.”
(3) Nothing in sections 6 and 7 of this 2021 Act, the amendments  to ORS 98.352, 98.386,
98.396, 98.992, 112.055, 116.193, 116.253, 178.050, 293.455, 293.701, 327.405, 708A.430, 711.225,
711.590, 716.905 and 723.466 by sections 1 and  10 to 25 of this 2021 Act or the repeal of ORS
98.388 by section 9 of this 2021 Act relieves  a person of a liability or obligation to the De-
partment of  State Lands, the Common School Fund Account or the Unclaimed Property Re-
volving Fund that accrues before, on or after the effective date of  this 2021 Act. The State
Treasurer may undertake the collection or enforcement of  any such liability, duty or obli-
gation for deposit into the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund.
(4) Nothing in section 7 of this 2021 Act  requires the Department of State Lands to
transfer any moneys,  however designated, that are unrelated to unclaimed or escheated
properties. The department may take any steps necessary before, on  or after the effective
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 3
date of this 2021 Act to separately identify any  moneys and reclassify or transfer any funds
for the purposes of  facilitating the transfers under section 7 of this 2021 Act. Nothing in
sections 2  to 7 of this 2021 Act may be interpreted to affect the use of any source of funds
that makes  up the Common School Fund as described in Article VIII, section 2, of the
Oregon Constitution.
(5) The State Treasurer is not required to  transfer any funds under section 6 (4) of this
2021 Act for the biennium ending June 30, 2021.
SECTION 9. ORS 98.388 is repealed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 98.352, as amended by section  10, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
98.352. (1) A holder  of property presumed abandoned under ORS 98.302 to 98.436 and 98.992 shall
deliver to the State Treasurer the report described in subsection (2) of this section and shall pay
or deliver to the State Treasurer, for deposit in  the [ Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund ] Un-
claimed Property and Estates Fund , all property presumed abandoned, except  that for the fol-
lowing funds the holder is not required to deliver the funds presumed abandoned  to the State
Treasurer:
(a) Funds transferred to the General Fund under ORS 293.455 (1)(a).
(b) Funds in the possession of the Child Support Program described in ORS 180.345.
(c) Funds described in ORS 9.725 (3) or 98.386 (2) that are held in lawyer trust accounts  or in
the possession of the Oregon State Bar.
(2) A report must include:
(a) Except  with respect to traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and address,
if known, of each person  appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of any property
of value of $50 or more presumed abandoned under ORS 98.302 to 98.436 and 98.992;
(b) In case of unclaimed  funds of life insurance corporations, the full name of the insured or
annuitant and last-known address according to the life insurance corporation’s records;
(c) The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the  property and the amount
appearing from the records to be due, except that  items of value under $50 each may be reported
in aggregate;
(d) The date when the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and  the date of the
last transaction with the owner with respect to the property; and
(e) Other information that the State Treasurer  prescribes by rule as necessary for the adminis-
tration of ORS 98.302 to 98.436 and 98.992.
(3) If the holder of property presumed abandoned is a successor to other holders or has  had a
name change while holding the property, the holder shall file with the report all prior known  names
and addresses and effective dates of changes.
(4) The holder shall file the report after October 1, but no later than November 1,  of each year
for accounts dormant as  of June 30. Upon written request from any person required to file a report,
the State Treasurer  may postpone the reporting date. All records are exempt from public review for
12 months from  the time the property is reportable and for 24 months after the property has been
remitted to the State Treasurer. All lists of records or property held by  a government or public
authority  under  ORS 98.336 are exempt from public review until 24 months after the property is
remitted to the State Treasurer.
(5) If the holder of property presumed abandoned under ORS 98.302 to 98.436  and 98.992 knows
the whereabouts of the owner and if  the owner’s claim is not barred by the statute of limitations,
the holder shall, before  filing the report, communicate with the owner and take necessary steps to
prevent abandonment from being presumed. The holder shall  exercise due diligence to ascertain the
whereabouts of the owner.
(6) If the property presumed abandoned is a lawyer trust account established by an  attorney or
law firm, the report  required by this section must indicate that the account is a lawyer trust ac-
count.
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 4
(7) The holder shall verify the accuracy of the information contained  in the report. Verification
must be executed by a partner if  made by a partnership, by an officer if made by an unincorporated
association or private corporation and by the chief fiscal officer if made by a public corporation.
SECTION 11.  ORS 98.386, as amended by section  20, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
98.386. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all funds received under ORS
98.302 to 98.436 and 98.992, including the proceeds from the sale  of unclaimed property under ORS
98.382, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in the [ Common School Fund  Account ] Unclaimed
Property and Estates Fund . Before making  the deposit, the State Treasurer shall record the name
and last-known address of each  person appearing from the holders’ reports to be entitled to the
unclaimed property and the name and last-known address  of each insured person or annuitant, and
with respect  to each policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance corporation, its
number, the name of the corporation, and the amount due.
(2) Any amounts identified as lawyer trust account funds in the  report required by ORS 98.352
shall be paid or delivered by the holder to the Oregon State Bar  along with a copy of the report.
All amounts paid or delivered to the Oregon State  Bar under this section are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon State Bar and may be used only  for the funding of legal services provided
through the Legal Services Program established under ORS 9.572, the payment of claims  allowed
under ORS 98.392 (2) and the payment of expenses incurred by the  Oregon State Bar in the admin-
istration of the Legal Services Program.
(3) Before making a deposit to the credit of the [ Common School Fund Account ] Unclaimed
Property and Estates Fund , the State Treasurer may deduct:
(a) Any costs in connection with sale of unclaimed property;
(b) Any costs of mailing and publication in connection with efforts to locate owners of unclaimed
property as prescribed by rule; and
(c) Reasonable service charges.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 98.396, as amended by section  23, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
98.396. (1) The State Treasurer shall consider any claim filed under ORS  98.392 and may hold
a hearing and receive evidence concerning the claim. If a  hearing is held, the State Treasurer shall
prepare findings and a decision in writing on each claim filed, stating the substance of  any evidence
heard by the State Treasurer and the reasons for the decision. A decision is a public record.
(2) If the claim allowed is for property deposited in the [ Common School  Fund Account ] Un-
claimed Property and Estates Fund , the State Treasurer shall return the property or make  pay-
ment of the proceeds of the sale of the property to the claimant.
(3) If the claim allowed is for funds deposited in the General Fund,  the State Treasurer shall
pay the claim from the fund against which the check or order represented in the claim was issued.
SECTION 13.  ORS 98.992, as amended by section  30, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
98.992. A person who willfully fails to render any report, to pay or deliver property or  to per-
form other duties required by ORS 98.302 to 98.436 and 98.992 may  be required to forfeit and pay
to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the [ Common School Fund Account ] Unclaimed Property
and Estates Fund , an amount determined by the State Treasurer pursuant  to ORS 183.745 of not
more than  $1,000 for individuals and $50,000 for corporations. This penalty shall be assessed only
after at least one reporting cycle, and only after the  State Treasurer has provided the person with
written instructions, including copies of applicable laws and policies. The State  Treasurer may
waive any penalty due under this section with appropriate justification.
SECTION 14.  ORS 112.055, as amended by section 31, chapter  678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
112.055. (1) If, after diligent search and inquiry that is appropriate to  the circumstances, taking
into account the value of the decedent’s estate, no person takes under ORS  112.025 to 112.045, the
net intestate estate escheats to the State of Oregon.
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 5
(2) If  a devisee or a person entitled to take under ORS 112.025 to 112.045 is not identified or
found, the share of that person escheats to the State of Oregon , and the share  must be delivered
to the State Treasurer for  deposit into the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund and subject
to claims under ORS 116.253 .
(3) If a devisee or a person entitled to take under ORS 112.025 to 112.045 is not identified  or
found:
(a) The State Treasurer has the same preference as the missing devisee or person for  the pur-
pose of appointment as personal representative under ORS 113.085;
(b) Title to property of the decedent  that would vest in the missing devisee or person under ORS
114.215 vests in the State Treasurer  to hold for the benefit of the Unclaimed Property and Es-
tates Fund and subject to claims under ORS 116.253 ; and
(c) The  State Treasurer has all of the rights of the missing devisee or person for the purposes
of ORS chapters 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116 and 117, including but not limited to the following:
(A) The right to contest any will of the decedent under ORS 113.075; and
(B) The right to information under ORS 113.145.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 116.193, as amended  by section 43, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
116.193. If  it appears to the court, at any time after the expiration of four months after the date
of the first publication of notice to interested  persons, that there is no known person to take by
descent the net intestate estate, the court shall order that the estate escheat to the State  of Oregon
and that the whole of the estate, after payment  of claims, taxes and expenses of administration, be
distributed to the State Treasurer  for deposit into the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund .
There shall  be no further proceeding in the administration of the estate, and the estate shall sum-
marily be closed.
SECTION 16.  ORS 116.253, as amended by section 46, chapter  678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
116.253. (1) Within 10 years after the death of a decedent  whose estate escheated in whole or
in part to the state, or within eight years after  the entry of a judgment or order escheating property
of an estate to the state, a claim may be made for the property escheated,  or the proceeds thereof,
by or on behalf of a person not having actual knowledge of the escheat or by or on behalf of  a
person who at the time of the escheat was unable to prove entitlement to the escheated property.
(2) The claim shall be made by a petition filed with the State Treasurer. The petition must in-
clude:
(a) A declaration by the petitioner under  penalty of perjury in the form required by ORCP 1 E
or an unsworn declaration under ORS 194.800  to 194.835 if the declarant is physically outside the
boundaries of the United States;
(b) The age and place of residence of the claimant by  whom or on whose behalf the petition is
filed;
(c) A brief description of the property or source of funds believed to have been escheated to the
state;
(d) That the claimant lawfully is entitled to the property or proceeds;
(e) That  at the time the property escheated to the state the claimant had no knowledge or notice
thereof or was unable to prove entitlement to the escheated property and  has subsequently acquired
new evidence of that entitlement;
(f) That the claimant claims the property or proceeds as an heir or devisee or as the personal
representative of the estate of  an heir or devisee, setting forth any relationship between the claim-
ant and the decedent who at the time of death owned the escheated property;
(g) That 10 years have not elapsed since the death  of the decedent or that eight years have not
elapsed since the entry of the judgment or order escheating the property to the state; and
(h) If the petition is not filed by the claimant, the status of the petitioner.
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 6
[(3) If the State Treasurer determines  that the claimant is entitled to the property or the proceeds
thereof, the State Treasurer shall deliver the property to the petitioner,  subject to and charged with any
tax on the property and the costs and expenses of the state in connection therewith. ]
(3) If the State Treasurer determines that the claimant is  entitled to escheated estate
property, the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Pay  from the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund the proportional share of the
proceeds or value of the property without  interest and subject to the proportional share of
the costs  of administering the estate, including attorney fees and personal representative
fees paid by the estate; or
(b) If  personal or real property is in the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund, transfer
the property without interest and subject to a claim of the Unclaimed  Property and Estates
Fund of a proportional share of the costs of administering the  estate, including attorney fees
and personal representative fees  paid by the estate, and any property taxes or other costs
of managing or improving the property, whether incurred before or after the  close of the
estate.
(4) If the person whose property escheated or reverted to  the state was at any time a patient
of a state institution in Oregon for persons with mental illness or of the Eastern  Oregon Training
Center, the reasonable unpaid cost of the care and maintenance of the person while a  ward of the
institution, regardless of when the cost was incurred, may be deducted from, or, if necessary, be
offset in full against, the amount of the escheated property. The  reasonable unpaid cost of care and
maintenance shall be determined in accordance with ORS 179.701.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the death of the decedent is presumed to have  occurred on
the date shown in the decedent’s certified copy  of the death record or in any other similar document
issued by the jurisdiction in which the death occurred or issued by an agency of the federal  gov-
ernment.
(6) A person aggrieved by a determination of the State Treasurer under  this section may seek
a contested case hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 293.455, as amended  by section 62, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
293.455. (1) After October 1, the State  Treasurer may refuse payment of the unpresented checks
or orders included in the report referred to in ORS 293.450.
The State Treasurer shall:
(a) Transfer and credit the amounts of the unpresented checks or orders dedicated for  general
funding to the General Fund.
(b) Transfer all other  funds to the [ Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund within the Common
School Fund Account ] Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund .
(c) Transfer and credit the amounts of the unpresented checks issued  under ORS chapters 316
and 317  to the [ Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund within the Common School Fund Account ] Un-
claimed Property and Estates Fund .
(2) In each instance, the State Treasurer shall issue an official  receipt for the amount so
transferred or credited.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 293.701, as amended  by section 64, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 7
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to  the Commission for the Blind under ORS 346.270 and 346.569 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development  Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current  demands
and that are invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728 or  in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that are not subject to the control and administration of officers  or bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800;
(u) Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
(v) Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
(w) Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405;
(x) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and Braille  Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195;
(y) Funds in the [ Unclaimed Property  Revolving Fund created in ORS 98.388 ] Unclaimed Prop-
erty and Estates Fund ; and
(z) Funds in the Common School Fund or any subaccount of the fund, that are available for
investment.
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as  investment officer for the
council.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 293.701, as amended  by section 64, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, and
section 16, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session), is amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to the Commission for the Blind under ORS  346.270 and 346.569 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and  State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 8
(n) Funds  in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands
and that are  invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728 or in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that are not subject to the control and administration of officers  or bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
(t) Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
(u) Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
(v) Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405;
(w) The State Library Donation Fund  and the Talking Book and Braille Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195;
(x) Funds in the [ Unclaimed Property  Revolving Fund created in ORS 98.388 ] Unclaimed Prop-
erty and Estates Fund ; and
(y) Funds in the  Common School Fund or any subaccount of the fund, that are available for
investment.
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as  investment officer for the
council.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 327.405, as amended  by section 66, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
327.405. (1) The Common School Fund [ shall be ] is  composed of :
(a) The proceeds from the sales of the  16th and 36th sections of every township or of any lands
selected in lieu thereof;
(b) All the  moneys and clear proceeds of all property that may accrue to the state by escheat
or forfeiture;
(c) The proceeds of all gifts, devises and bequests made by any person to the state  for common
school  purposes;
(d) The  proceeds of all property granted to the state when the purpose of such grant is not
stated;
(e) All proceeds of the sale of submerged and submersible lands as described in ORS 274.005;
(f) All proceeds of the sale of the South Slough National Estuarine Research Reserve as  de-
scribed in ORS 273.553 in the event such property is sold;
(g) All proceeds of the  sale of the 500,000 acres of land to which this state is entitled by an
Act of Congress approved September 4, 1841, and of all lands selected for capitol building  purposes
under Act of Congress approved February 14, 1859;
(h) Moneys credited to the fund or transferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly;
and
(i) All proceeds derived from the investment of moneys that compose the fund. [ All such proceeds
shall become a part of the fund. ]
(2) Except as otherwise provided by  law, the income from the fund [ shall] must  be applied ex-
clusively to the support and maintenance of common schools in each school district.
[(2) The State  Treasurer shall audit all lawful claims for repayment of moneys under ORS 98.302
to 98.436 and 98.992, or out  of escheated estates and funds, including attorney fees and all other ex-
penses in any  suit or proceeding relating to escheated estates and shall pay each lawful claim from the
Common School Fund Account. ]
SECTION 21.  ORS 711.225, as amended  by section 71, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
711.225. Six months after the mailing of the written notice described  in ORS 711.220 (3), the
Oregon stock bank shall  deliver a report and all deposits that remain unclaimed to the State
Treasurer as unclaimed property [ for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Revolving  Fund ] under ORS
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 9
98.352 and deliver a copy of the report  filed with the State Treasurer to the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services.
SECTION 22.  ORS 711.590, as amended  by section 74, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
711.590. (1) Two years after the date of the final order closing  the liquidation of an institution,
the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services may withdraw any unclaimed
deposits or balances remaining  to the credit of dividend accounts, representing the aggregate of
undelivered checks or unpaid dividend funds in the possession of the Department  of Consumer and
Business Services, and report and pay the funds to the State Treasurer as unclaimed property [ for
deposit in the Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund ] under ORS 98.352.
(2) The interest earned on the  dividend accounts while they remain in the possession of the di-
rector shall be paid to the  State Treasurer to be credited to the Consumer and Business Services
Fund and no person entitled to the accounts has any claim to the interest.
SECTION 23.  ORS 716.905, as amended  by section 75, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
716.905. (1) Upon approval of a plan under ORS 716.900,  the directors shall mail written notice
of their  intention to close the Oregon nonstock bank to the last-known address of all depositors and
other creditors.
(2) All deposits and amounts reserved for creditors that remain unclaimed after six months from
the date of the written notice required under subsection (1)  of this section shall be reported and
transferred by the directors to the State Treasurer as unclaimed property [ for deposit in the  Un-
claimed Property Revolving Fund ] under ORS 98.352.
(3) A copy of the report  of unclaimed deposits and amounts reserved for creditors filed with the
State Treasurer shall be  filed with the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices.
SECTION 24.  ORS 708A.430, as amended  by section 69, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
708A.430. (1) On the death of a depositor  of an insured institution, if the deposit is $25,000 or
less, the insured institution, after receiving an affidavit as provided in subsection  (3) of this section
from a person that claims the deposit, or a declaration  from the Department of Human Services or
the Oregon  Health Authority as provided in subsection (4) of this section, may pay the moneys on
deposit to the credit of the deceased depositor, in the following order of priority, to:
(a) The surviving spouse at the surviving spouse’s demand at  any time after the depositor’s
death;
(b) The  Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Services, if the authority or the
department demands the payment not less than 46 days and no more  than 75 days after the death
of the depositor if the depositor does not have a surviving  spouse and if the authority or department
has a preferred claim under ORS 411.708, 411.795 or 416.350;
(c) The  depositor’s surviving children 18 years of age or older, if the depositor does not have a
surviving spouse and the authority and department do not have a claim;
(d) The depositor’s surviving  parent, if the depositor does not have a surviving spouse or sur-
viving child 18 years of age or older and if the authority and department do not have a claim;
(e) The depositor’s surviving brothers and sisters 18 years of age or older, if  the depositor does
not have a surviving spouse, surviving child 18 years of age or older or surviving  parent and the
authority and department do not have a claim; or
(f) Any other surviving heir of the depositor, if there is  no surviving spouse, authority claim,
department claim, surviving child 18 years of age or older, surviving  parent or surviving brothers
or sisters 18 years of age or older.
(2)(a) An insured institution may not  pay moneys on deposit under subsection (1)(c) to (f) of this
section earlier than 46 days after the death of the depositor.
(b) An insured institution may not pay moneys  on deposit under subsection (1)(c) to (f) of this
section earlier than  76 days after the death of the depositor unless the financial institution obtains
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 10
prior verbal or written authorization from the Oregon Health Authority  or its designated represen-
tative and the Department of Human Services or its designated representative.
(3) An affidavit or declaration submitted under this section must:
(a) State where and when the depositor died;
(b) State that the total deposits of the deceased depositor in all  financial institutions in Oregon
do not exceed $25,000;
(c) Show the relationship of the affiant or declarant to the deceased depositor; and
(d) Embody a promise to pay the expenses of last sickness, funeral  expenses and just debts of
the deceased depositor out of the deposit to the full extent of the deposit if necessary, in the  order
of priority  prescribed by ORS 115.125, and to distribute any remaining moneys to the persons that
are entitled to the moneys by law.
(4) An insured institution shall accept from the  Department of Human Services or the Oregon
Health Authority, without additional requirements, a  declaration under penalty of perjury meeting
the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. A declaration submitted under this  section must
be signed by the declarant and must include the following sentence immediately  above the signature
line of the declarant:  “I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I am authorized by the De-
partment of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority to make this declaration, that the
above statement is true to the best of my knowledge and belief, and that I understand  that it is
subject to penalty for perjury.”
(5) In the event  the depositor died intestate without known heirs, an estate administrator of the
State Treasurer appointed under  ORS 113.235 is the affiant and shall receive the moneys [ as escheat
property] for deposit into the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund as escheated property and
subject to claims under ORS 116.253 .
(6) The insured institution shall determine the relationship of the affiant  or declarant to the
deceased depositor, but paying the moneys in good faith to the affiant or  declarant discharges and
releases the insured institution from any liability or responsibility for the transfer in the same
manner and with the same effect as  if the insured institution transferred, delivered or paid the
moneys to a personal representative of the estate of the deceased depositor.
(7) A probate proceeding is not necessary  to establish the right of the surviving spouse, Oregon
Health Authority, Department of Human Services,  surviving child, surviving parent, surviving
brothers and sisters or an estate administrator of  the State Treasurer to withdraw the deposits after
filing the affidavit or declaration.  If a personal representative is appointed in an estate where a
withdrawal of deposits was made under this section, the person that withdraws the deposits  shall
account for the deposits to the personal representative.
(8) If an insured institution transfers moneys  under subsection (1) of this section, the insured
institution may require  the transferee to furnish the insured institution with a written indemnity
agreement that indemnifies the insured institution against loss for moneys  the insured institution
transferred to the extent of the amount of the deposit.
(9)(a) Moneys disbursed  to the Department of Human Services under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion may be made payable only to the department.
(b) Moneys disbursed  to the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (1) of this section may
be made payable only to the authority.
(10) This section is subject to the rights of other parties in the account under  ORS 708A.455 to
708A.515.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 723.466, as amended by section 77, chapter  678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
723.466. (1) On the death of  a member of a credit union, if the deposit to the credit of the de-
ceased member is $25,000 or less, the credit union may, upon receipt of an affidavit from a person
claiming the deposit as  provided in subsection (3) of this section, or a declaration from the Depart-
ment of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority as provided in subsection (4)  of this sec-
tion, pay the moneys on deposit:
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 11
(a) To the surviving spouse on demand of the surviving spouse at any time after  the death of
the member;
(b) If there is no surviving spouse, to the Oregon Health Authority  or the Department of Human
Services, on demand of the authority or the department no less than 46 days and no  more than 75
days after the death  of the member when there is a preferred claim arising under ORS 411.708,
411.795 or 416.350;
(c) If there is no  surviving spouse and no authority or department claim, to the member’s sur-
viving children 18 years of age or older;
(d) If there is no surviving spouse, authority claim, department claim or  surviving child 18 years
of age or older, to the member’s surviving parents;
(e) If there is no surviving spouse, authority claim, department claim,  surviving child 18 years
of age or older or surviving parent, to the  member’s surviving brothers and sisters 18 years of age
or older; or
(f) If there is no  surviving spouse, authority claim, department claim, surviving child 18 years
of age or older, surviving parent or surviving brothers or sisters 18 years of age  or older, to any
other surviving heir of the member.
(2)(a) A credit union may not pay moneys on deposit under subsection (1)(c) to (f) of this section
earlier than 46 days after the death of the member.
(b) A credit union may not pay moneys on deposit under subsection (1)(c) to (f) of  this section
earlier than 76 days after the death of the member  unless the financial institution obtains prior
verbal or written authorization from the Oregon Health Authority or its designated  representative
and the Department of Human Services or its designated representative.
(3) An affidavit or declaration submitted under this section must:
(a) State where and when the member died;
(b) State  that the total deposits of the deceased member in all financial institutions in this state
do not exceed $25,000;
(c) Show the relationship of the affiant or declarant to the deceased member; and
(d) Embody a promise to pay the expenses of last sickness, funeral  expenses and just debts of
the deceased member out of  the deposit, to the full extent of the deposit if necessary, in the order
of priority  prescribed by ORS 115.125, and to distribute any remaining moneys to the persons who
are entitled to those moneys by law.
(4) A credit union shall accept from the Department of Human  Services or the Oregon Health
Authority, without additional requirements, a declaration  under penalty of perjury meeting the re-
quirements of subsection (3) of this section. A declaration submitted under this  section must be
signed by the declarant  and must include the following sentence immediately above the signature
line of the declarant: “I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I am authorized  by the De-
partment of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority to make this declaration, that the
above statement is true  to the best of my knowledge and belief, and that I understand that it is
subject to penalty for perjury.”
(5) In the event the member died intestate without known  heirs, an estate administrator of the
State Treasurer appointed under ORS  113.235 shall be the affiant and shall receive the moneys [ as
escheat property ] for deposit into the  Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund as escheated
property and subject to claims under ORS 116.253 .
(6) The credit union shall determine the relationship of the affiant or  declarant to the deceased
member. However, payment of the moneys in good faith to the affiant  or declarant discharges and
releases the transferor from any liability or responsibility for the  transfer in the same manner and
with the same effect as if the property had been transferred,  delivered or paid to a personal repre-
sentative of the estate of the deceased member.
(7) A probate proceeding is not necessary  to establish the right of the surviving spouse, Oregon
Health Authority, Department of  Human Services, surviving children, surviving parents, surviving
brothers and sisters or an estate administrator  of the State Treasurer to withdraw the deposits upon
the filing of the affidavit or declaration. If a personal representative is appointed  in an estate where
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 12
a withdrawal of  deposits was made under this section, the person withdrawing the deposits shall
account for them to the personal representative.
(8) When a credit  union transfers moneys under subsection (1) of this section, the transferor
may require the transferee to furnish  the transferor with a written indemnity agreement, indem-
nifying the transferor against loss for moneys paid to the extent of the amount of the deposit.
(9)(a) Moneys disbursed to the Department of Human Services under subsection (1) of  this sec-
tion may be made payable only to the department.
(b) Moneys disbursed to the Oregon Health Authority under subsection (1) of this  section may
be made payable only to the authority.
(10) This section is  subject to the rights of other parties to the account under ORS 723.474 to
723.498.
OTHER UNCLAIMED PROPERTY
SECTION 26.  ORS 63.674, as amended by section  49, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
63.674. Assets of a dissolved  limited liability company that should be distributed to a creditor,
claimant or member of the limited liability company  who cannot be found or who is not competent
to receive them shall be  reduced to cash and, within six months after the final distribution of such
liquidation or winding  up is payable, deposited with the State Treasurer as unclaimed property
under ORS 98.352 . The  receiver or other liquidating agent shall prepare in duplicate and under
oath a statement containing the names and last-known  addresses of the persons entitled to such
funds. One of the statements shall be  filed with the State Treasurer and another shall be delivered
to the office  for filing. [The funds shall then escheat to and become the property of the State of Oregon
and shall become a part of the Common School Fund. The person entitled to the distribution  may re-
claim any funds so deposited  in the manner provided in ORS 116.253 for estates that have escheated
to the state. ]
SECTION 27.  ORS 65.674, as amended by section  50, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
65.674. Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant or
member of  the corporation who cannot be found or who is not competent to receive them shall be
reduced to cash unless they are subject to known trust  restrictions and deposited with the State
Treasurer [ for safekeeping ] as unclaimed property under ORS 98.352 . However,  in the discretion
of the State Treasurer, property of unusual historic or  aesthetic interest may be received and held
in kind. The receiver or other liquidating agent shall prepare in duplicate  and under oath a state-
ment containing the names  and last-known addresses of the persons entitled to such funds. One of
the statements shall be  filed with the State Treasurer and another shall be delivered to the Secre-
tary of State for filing. [ The funds shall then escheat to and become the property of the State of Oregon
and shall become part of the Common School Fund. The person entitled to the transfer may  reclaim
any funds so  deposited in the manner provided in ORS 116.253 for estates that have escheated to the
state.]
SECTION 28.  ORS 652.405, as amended  by section 67, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
652.405. (1) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall attempt for  a period
of not less than three years to make payment of  wages collected under ORS 652.310 to 652.414 to
the person entitled thereto.
(2) By July 30 of each year, the commissioner shall pay  wages collected by  the commissioner
under ORS 652.310 to 652.414 and remaining  unclaimed for a period of more than three years from
the date of collection [ shall escheat to the state and the commissioner shall pay those wages ] to the
State Treasurer [ for the benefit of the Common School  Fund ] as unclaimed property under ORS
98.352 or, by October 1 of  each year, transfer the wages to the State Treasurer under ORS
293.455. The State  Treasurer shall issue a receipt for the money to the commissioner. [ No later than
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 13
10 years after  the State Treasurer receives the escheated funds, a person entitled to claim the wages
may file a claim with the State Treasurer in the manner provided by ORS 116.253. ]
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 29.  Section 85, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 18b, chapter
10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 85.  (1) Sections 1 to 6, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019,  become operative on [ July 1,
2021] the effective date of this 2021 Act .
(2) The amendments to statutes and session law by  sections 7 to 80, chapter 678, Oregon Laws
2019, become operative on [ July 1, 2021 ] the effective date of this 2021 Act .
[(3) The amendments to section 22, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018,  by section 81, chapter 678,
Oregon Laws 2019, become operative on the effective date of this 2020 second special session Act. ]
[(4) The amendments to section 22,  chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, by section 82, chapter 678,
Oregon Laws 2019, become operative on the effective date of this 2020 second special session Act. ]
[(5)] (3) The State Treasurer,  the Department of State Lands and the State Land Board may take
any actions before the operative dates specified in subsections [ (1) to (4) ] (1) and (2) of this section
necessary to enable the State Treasurer to exercise, on and after the operative dates specified in
subsections [ (1) to (4) ] (1) and (2)  of this section, the  duties, functions and powers required under
chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 30.
The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 31. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 14
Passed by House June 2, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2158 (HB 2158-A) Page 15